Utah statutes.
20A-3-601.   Early voting.

(1)  A person who is registered to vote may vote before the election date in accordance with this section.

(2)  Except as provided in Section 20A-1-308, the early voting period shall:

(a)  begin on the date that is 14 days before the date of the election; and

(b)  continue through the Friday before the election if the election date is a Tuesday.

(3)  Except as provided in Section 20A-1-308, during the early voting period, the election officer:

(a)  for a local special election, a municipal primary election, and a municipal general election:

(i)  shall conduct early voting on a minimum of four days during each week of the early voting period; and

(ii)  shall conduct early voting on the last day of the early voting period; and

(b)  for all other elections:

(i)  shall conduct early voting on each weekday; and

(ii)  may elect to conduct early voting on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.

(4)  Except as specifically provided in this Part 6, Early Voting, or Section 20A-1-308, early voting shall be administered according to the requirements of this title.



Amended by Chapter 182, 2013 General Session

